District of Columbia statutes.
2-225.10

Repealed

Purchasing sites for schools and public buildings; use of agents; enlargement of school buildings.

Repealed.

Mar. 2, 1889, 25 Stat. 802, ch. 370
June 6, 1900, 31 Stat. 568, ch. 789
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, §§ 1103(g), (h)
1981 Ed., § 1-1115.
1973 Ed., § 1-812.